Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Preliminary Provisions

407.010.
Short title — Purpose. [Repealed.]

407.020.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

407.030.
Persons legally liable for support of dependents. [Repealed.]

407.040.
Jurisdiction and powers of court. [Repealed.]

407.050.
Cases in which proceedings are maintainable. [Repealed.]

407.060.
Procedure. [Repealed.]

407.070.
Duty of petitioner’s representatives. [Repealed.]

407.080.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed.]

407.090.
Uniformity of interpretation. [Repealed.]

407.100.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

407.110.
Remedies additional to others. [Repealed.]

407.120.
Extent of duties of support. [Repealed.]

407.130.
Interstate rendition.

The Governor of this state: (1) may demand from the Governor of any other state the surrender of any person found in such other state who is charged in this state with the crime of failing to provide for the support of any person in this state; and (2) may surrender on demand by the Governor of any other state any person found in this state who is charged in such other state with the crime of failing to provide for the support of a person in such other state. The provisions for extradition of criminals not inconsistent herewith shall apply to any such demand although the person whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the crime and although he had not fled therefrom. Neither the demand, the oath nor any proceedings for extradition pursuant to this section need state or show that the person whose surrender is demanded has fled from justice, or at the time of the commission of the crime was in the demanding or other state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 190, § 5, effective July 1, 1954.

407.140.
Relief from extradition. [Repealed.]

407.150.
Choice of law. [Repealed.]

407.160.
Remedies of a state or political subdivision furnishing support. [Repealed.]

407.170.
Enforcement of duties — Jurisdiction of proceedings. [Repealed.]